Illinois, session 104th, SB3194.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-413 and 11-506 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-413)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-413)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-125)8    Sec. 3-413. Display of registration plates or digital 9registration plates, registration stickers or digital 10registration stickers, and drive-away permits; registration 11plate or digital registration plate covers.12    (a) Registration plates or digital registration plates 13issued for a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle, autocycle, 14trailer, semitrailer, truck-tractor, apportioned bus, or 15apportioned truck shall be attached thereto, one in the 16frontmost and one in the rearmost. The registration plate or 17digital registration plate issued for a motorcycle, autocycle, 18trailer or semitrailer required to be registered hereunder and 19any apportionment plate issued to a bus under the provisions 20of this Code shall be attached to the rearmost thereof. The 21registration plate or digital registration plate issued for a 22truck-tractor or an apportioned truck required to be 23registered hereunder shall be attached to the frontmost   SB3194- 2 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1thereof.2    (b) Except for vehicles with rear loaded motorized 3forklifts, every registration plate or digital registration 4plate shall at all times be securely fastened in a horizontal 5position to the vehicle for which it is issued so as to prevent 6the plate from swinging and at a height of not less than 5 7inches from the ground, measuring from the bottom of such 8plate, in a place and position to be clearly visible and shall 9be maintained in a condition to be clearly legible, free from 10any materials that would obstruct the visibility of the plate. 11A registration plate or digital registration plate on a 12motorcycle may be mounted vertically as long as it is 13otherwise clearly visible. Registration stickers or digital 14registration stickers issued as evidence of renewed annual 15registration shall be attached to registration plates or 16displayed on digital registration plates as required by the 17Secretary of State, and be clearly visible at all times and 18displayed as prescribed in subsection (k). For those vehicles 19with rear loaded motorized forklifts, if the rear plate is 20securely fastened in a horizontal position as prescribed, the 21plate and registration sticker shall not be required to be 22clearly visible at all times as a result of the rear mounted 23motorized forklift obstructing the view. 24    (c) Every drive-away permit issued pursuant to this Code 25shall be firmly attached to the motor vehicle in the manner 26prescribed by the Secretary of State. If a drive-away permit   SB3194- 3 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1is affixed to a motor vehicle in any other manner the permit 2shall be void and of no effect.3    (d) The Illinois prorate decal issued to a foreign 4registered vehicle part of a fleet prorated or apportioned 5with Illinois, shall be displayed on a registration plate or 6digital registration plate and displayed on the frontmost of 7such vehicle in the same manner as an Illinois registration 8plate or digital registration plate.9    (e) The registration plate or digital registration plate 10issued for a camper body mounted on a truck displaying 11registration plates or digital registration plates shall be 12attached to the rearmost of the camper body.13    (f) No person shall operate a vehicle, nor permit the 14operation of a vehicle, upon which is displayed an Illinois 15registration plate or plates or digital registration plate or 16plates or registration stickers or digital registration 17stickers, except as provided for in subsection (b) of Section 183-701 of this Code, after the termination of the registration 19period for which issued or after the expiration date set 20pursuant to Sections 3-414 and 3-414.1 of this Code.21    (g) A person may not operate any motor vehicle that is 22equipped with registration plate or digital registration plate 23covers. A violation of this subsection (g) or a similar 24provision of a local ordinance is an offense against laws and 25ordinances regulating the movement of traffic.26    (h) A person may not sell or offer for sale a registration   SB3194- 4 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1plate or digital registration plate cover. A violation of this 2subsection (h) is a business offense.3    (i) A person may not advertise for the purpose of 4promoting the sale of registration plate or digital 5registration plate covers. A violation of this subsection (i) 6is a business offense.7    (j) A person may not modify the original manufacturer's 8mounting location of the rear registration plate or digital 9registration plate on any vehicle so as to conceal the 10registration or to knowingly cause it to be obstructed in an 11effort to hinder a peace officer from obtaining the 12registration for the enforcement of a violation of this Code, 13Section 27.1 of the Toll Highway Act concerning toll evasion, 14or any municipal ordinance. Modifications prohibited by this 15subsection (j) include but are not limited to the use of an 16electronic device. A violation of this subsection (j) is a 17Class A misdemeanor.18    (k) Registration stickers issued as evidence of renewed 19registration by the Secretary shall be displayed on the upper 20right corner of the rear registration plate or in a manner 21otherwise provided by the Secretary. However, registration 22stickers issued to truck-tractors shall be displayed on the 23upper right corner of the front registration plate or in a 24manner otherwise provided by the Secretary.25    (l) No person shall affix to any registration plate, 26temporary registration plate, digital registration plate,   SB3194- 5 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1registration sticker, or other evidence of registration issued 2by the Secretary any medallion, insignia, sticker, or other 3object not issued or approved by the Secretary. No person 4shall alter, manipulate, apply, or otherwise manipulate any 5evidence of registration issued by the Secretary in any manner 6from the original condition as was received when issued by the 7Secretary. It is unlawful to operate any vehicle that displays 8evidence of registration altered in any manner or displaying 9any medallion, insignia, sticker, or other object as 10prescribed in this subsection. 11(Source: P.A. 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-125)13    Sec. 3-413. Display of registration plates or digital 14registration plates, registration stickers or digital 15registration stickers, and drive-away permits; registration 16plate or digital registration plate covers.17    (a) Registration plates or digital registration plates 18issued for a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle, autocycle, 19trailer, semitrailer, truck-tractor, apportioned bus, or 20apportioned truck shall be attached thereto, one in the 21frontmost and one in the rearmost. The registration plate or 22digital registration plate issued for a motorcycle, autocycle, 23trailer or semitrailer required to be registered hereunder and 24any apportionment plate issued to a bus under the provisions 25of this Code shall be attached to the rearmost thereof. The   SB3194- 6 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1registration plate or digital registration plate issued for a 2truck-tractor or an apportioned truck required to be 3registered hereunder shall be attached to the frontmost 4thereof.5    (b) Except for vehicles with rear loaded motorized 6forklifts, every registration plate or digital registration 7plate shall at all times be securely fastened in a horizontal 8position to the vehicle for which it is issued so as to prevent 9the plate from swinging and at a height of not less than 5 10inches from the ground, measuring from the bottom of such 11plate, in a place and position to be clearly visible and shall 12be maintained in a condition to be clearly legible, free from 13any materials that would obstruct the visibility of the plate. 14A registration plate or digital registration plate on a 15motorcycle may be mounted vertically as long as it is 16otherwise clearly visible. Registration stickers or digital 17registration stickers issued as evidence of renewed annual 18registration shall be attached to registration plates or 19displayed on digital registration plates as required by the 20Secretary of State, and be clearly visible at all times and 21displayed as prescribed in subsection (k). For those vehicles 22with rear loaded motorized forklifts, if the rear plate is 23securely fastened in a horizontal position as prescribed, the 24plate and registration sticker shall not be required to be 25clearly visible at all times as a result of the rear mounted 26motorized forklift obstructing the view.   SB3194- 7 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1    (c) Every drive-away permit issued pursuant to this Code 2shall be firmly attached to the motor vehicle in the manner 3prescribed by the Secretary of State. If a drive-away permit 4is affixed to a motor vehicle in any other manner the permit 5shall be void and of no effect.6    (d) The Illinois prorate decal issued to a foreign 7registered vehicle part of a fleet prorated or apportioned 8with Illinois, shall be displayed on a registration plate or 9digital registration plate and displayed on the frontmost of 10such vehicle in the same manner as an Illinois registration 11plate or digital registration plate.12    (e) The registration plate or digital registration plate 13issued for a camper body mounted on a truck displaying 14registration plates or digital registration plates shall be 15attached to the rearmost of the camper body.16    (f) No person shall operate a vehicle, nor permit the 17operation of a vehicle, upon which is displayed an Illinois 18registration plate or plates or digital registration plate or 19plates or registration stickers or digital registration 20stickers, except as provided for in subsection (b) of Section 213-701 of this Code, after the termination of the registration 22period for which issued or after the expiration date set 23pursuant to Sections 3-414 and 3-414.1 of this Code.24    (g) A person may not operate any motor vehicle that is 25equipped with registration plate or digital registration plate 26covers. A violation of this subsection (g) or a similar   SB3194- 8 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1provision of a local ordinance is an offense against laws and 2ordinances regulating the movement of traffic.3    (h) A person may not sell or offer for sale a registration 4plate or digital registration plate cover. A violation of this 5subsection (h) is a business offense.6    (i) A person may not advertise for the purpose of 7promoting the sale of registration plate or digital 8registration plate covers. A violation of this subsection (i) 9is a business offense.10    (j) A person may not modify the original manufacturer's 11mounting location of the rear registration plate or digital 12registration plate on any vehicle so as to conceal the 13registration or to knowingly cause it to be obstructed in an 14effort to hinder a peace officer from obtaining the 15registration for the enforcement of a violation of this Code, 16Section 27.1 of the Toll Highway Act concerning toll evasion, 17or any municipal ordinance. Modifications prohibited by this 18subsection (j) include but are not limited to the use of an 19electronic device. A violation of this subsection (j) is a 20Class A misdemeanor.21    (k) Registration stickers issued as evidence of renewed 22registration by the Secretary shall be displayed on the upper 23right corner of the rear registration plate or in a manner 24otherwise provided by the Secretary. However, registration 25stickers issued to truck-tractors shall be displayed on the 26upper right corner of the front registration plate or in a   SB3194- 9 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1manner otherwise provided by the Secretary.2    (l) No person shall affix to any registration plate, 3temporary registration plate, digital registration plate, 4registration sticker, or other evidence of registration issued 5by the Secretary any medallion, insignia, sticker, tape, or 6other object not issued or approved by the Secretary. No 7person shall alter, manipulate, apply, or otherwise manipulate 8any evidence of registration issued by the Secretary in any 9manner from the original condition as was received when issued 10by the Secretary. It is unlawful to operate any vehicle that 11(i) displays evidence of registration altered in any manner or 12displaying any medallion, insignia, sticker, tape, or other 13object as prescribed in this subsection or (ii) is equipped 14with a manual, electronic, or mechanical device that hides or 15obscures a registration plate. 16    (m) A person who operates a motorcycle without proper 17registration plates shall have the motorcycle seized and 18auctioned of to State or motorcycle programs to reduce the 19purchase of new motorcycles for any State or motorcycle 20program. 21(Source: P.A. 103-706, eff. 1-1-25; 104-125, eff. 1-1-26.) 22    (625 ILCS 5/11-506)23    Sec. 11-506. Street racing; aggravated street racing; 24street sideshows.25    (a) No person shall engage in street racing on any street   SB3194- 10 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1or highway of this State.2    (a-5) No person shall engage in a street sideshow on any 3street or highway of this State. 4    (b) No owner of any vehicle shall acquiesce in or permit 5his or her vehicle to be used by another for the purpose of 6street racing or a street sideshow.7    (b-5) A person may not knowingly interfere with or cause 8the movement of traffic to slow or stop for the purpose of 9facilitating street racing or a street sideshow. 10    (c) For the purposes of this Section:11    "Acquiesce" or "permit" means actual knowledge that the 12motor vehicle was to be used for the purpose of street racing 13or a street sideshow.14    "Motor vehicle stunt" includes, but is not limited to, 15operating a vehicle in a manner that causes the vehicle to 16slide or spin, driving within the proximity of a gathering of 17persons, performing maneuvers to demonstrate the performance 18capability of the motor vehicle, or maneuvering the vehicle in 19an attempt to elicit a reaction from a gathering of persons. 20    "Street racing" means:21        (1) The operation of 2 or more vehicles from a point 22    side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive 23    attempt to outdistance each other; or24        (2) The operation of one or more vehicles over a 25    common selected course, each starting at the same point, 26    for the purpose of comparing the relative speeds or power   SB3194- 11 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1    of acceleration of such vehicle or vehicles within a 2    certain distance or time limit; or3        (3) The use of one or more vehicles in an attempt to 4    outgain or outdistance another vehicle; or5        (4) The use of one or more vehicles to prevent another 6    vehicle from passing; or7        (5) The use of one or more vehicles to arrive at a 8    given destination ahead of another vehicle or vehicles; or9        (6) The use of one or more vehicles to test the 10    physical stamina or endurance of drivers over 11    long-distance driving routes.12    "Street sideshow" means an event in which one or more 13vehicles block or impede traffic on a street or highway, for 14the purpose of performing unauthorized motor vehicle stunts, 15motor vehicle speed contests, or motor vehicle exhibitions of 16speed. 17    (d) Penalties.18        (1) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 19    subsection (a), (a-5), or (b-5) shall be guilty of a Class 20    A misdemeanor for the first offense and shall be subject 21    to a minimum fine of $250. Any person convicted of a 22    violation of subsection (a), (a-5), or (b-5) a second or 23    subsequent time shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony and 24    shall be subject to a minimum fine of $500. The driver's 25    license of any person convicted of subsection (a) shall be 26    revoked in the manner provided by Section 6-205 of this   SB3194- 12 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1    Code.2        (2) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 3    subsection (b) shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. 4    Any person who is convicted of subsection (b) for a second 5    or subsequent time shall be guilty of a Class A 6    misdemeanor.7        (3) Every person convicted of committing a violation 8    of subsection (a) of this Section shall be guilty of 9    aggravated street racing if the person, in committing a 10    violation of subsection (a) was involved in a motor 11    vehicle crash that resulted in great bodily harm or 12    permanent disability or disfigurement to another, where 13    the violation was a proximate cause of the injury. 14    Aggravated street racing is a Class 4 felony for which the 15    defendant, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 16    be sentenced to not less than one year nor more than 12 17    years.18        (4) Any person who owns a business that profits from 19    selling merchandise promoting any violation of this 20    Section shall be fined $500 for a first offense and, for a 21    second offense, shall be charged with a Class 4 felony 22    and, for a third offense, shall be charged with a Class 3 23    felony. 24(Source: P.A. 102-733, eff. 1-1-23; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 25103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.)   SB3194- 13 -LRB104 15833 LNS 29045 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act.